Generated/uz.aff
FLAG long
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdanchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdandir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdanda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdanku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdanmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdandirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagimi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagichi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagidir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagida [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagiku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagimikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagimidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagidirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagidekmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagidekchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagidekdir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagidekda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagidekku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagidekmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagidekmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimdagidekdirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgachami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgachachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgachadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgachada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgachaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgachamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgachamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimgachadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimiznimi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimiznichi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimiznidir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimiznida [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizniku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimiznimikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimiznimidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimiznidirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizningmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizningchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizningdir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizningda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizningku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizningmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizningdirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdanchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdandir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdanda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdanku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdanmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdandirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagimi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagichi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagidir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagida [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagiku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagimikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagimidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagidirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagidekmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagidekchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagidekdir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagidekda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagidekku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagidekmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagidekmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizdagidekdirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgachami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgachachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgachadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgachada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgachaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgachamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgachamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarimizgachadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringnimi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringnichi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringnidir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringnida [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringniku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringnimikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringnimidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringnidirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringningmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringningchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringningdir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringningda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringningku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringningmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringningdirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdanchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdandir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdanda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdanku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdanmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdandirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagimi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagichi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagidir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagida [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagiku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagimikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagimidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagidirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagidekmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagidekchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagidekdir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagidekda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagidekku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagidekmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagidekmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringdagidekdirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgachami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgachachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgachadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgachada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgachaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgachamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgachamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringgachadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringiznimi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringiznichi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringiznidir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringiznida [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizniku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringiznimikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringiznimidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringiznidirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizningmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizningchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizningdir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizningda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizningku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizningmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizningdirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdanchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdandir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdanda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdanku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdanmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdandirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagimi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagichi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagidir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagida [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagiku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagimikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagimidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagidirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagidekmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagidekchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagidekdir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagidekda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagidekku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagidekmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagidekmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizdagidekdirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgachami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgachachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgachadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgachada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgachaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgachamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgachamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaringizgachadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarinimi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarinichi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarinidir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarinida [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilariniku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarinimikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarinimidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarinidirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilariningmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilariningchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilariningdir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilariningda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilariningku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilariningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilariningmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilariningdirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridanmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridanchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridandir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridanda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridanku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridanmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridandirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagimi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagichi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagidir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagida [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagiku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagimikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagimidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagidirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagidekmi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagidekchi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagidekdir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagidekda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagidekku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagidekmikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagidekmidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilaridagidekdirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigadirda [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigachami [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigachachi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigachadir [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigachada [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigachaku [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigachamikan [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigachamidi [^aeiou]
SFX Bk 0 inchilarigachadirda [^aeiou]

# SON/SON-DONA : DONA
SFX Bl Y 2
SFX Bl r tta r
SFX Bl 0 ta [^r]

# SON/SON-DONA : DONA:_
SFX Bm Y 2
SFX Bm r ttalik r
SFX Bm 0 talik [^r]

# SON/SON-DONA : DONA:1SHB
SFX Bn Y 10
SFX Bn r ttam r
SFX Bn r ttamiz r
SFX Bn r ttang r
SFX Bn r ttangiz r
SFX Bn r ttasi r
SFX Bn 0 tam [^r]
SFX Bn 0 tamiz [^r]
SFX Bn 0 tang [^r]
SFX Bn 0 tangiz [^r]
SFX Bn 0 tasi [^r]

# SON/SON-DONA : DONA:_:1SHB
SFX Bo Y 10
SFX Bo r ttaligim r
SFX Bo r ttaligimiz r
SFX Bo r ttaliging r
SFX Bo r ttaligingiz r
SFX Bo r ttaligi r
SFX Bo 0 taligim [^r]
SFX Bo 0 taligimiz [^r]
SFX Bo 0 taliging [^r]
SFX Bo 0 taligingiz [^r]
SFX Bo 0 taligi [^r]
